Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1239.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3103 of Title 68 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 3103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subpart and in the declaration and bylaws shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless specifically provided otherwise or unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Detached roof." A roof of a unit that is solely owned by an 12345678910111213141516171819 individual , IS NOT MAINTAINED, REPAIRED OR REPLACED BY THE ASSOCIATION and is not designated as part of the common elements in the governing documents of the association.* * *"Solar energy system." Any of the following that have the primary purpose of providing for the collection, storage and distribution of solar or radiant energy received from the sun : (1) A solar collection panel, film, shingle or other solar energy device.(2) A solar structural component fixed in an operating position.* * *Section 2. Section 3302 of Title 68 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3302. Powers of unit owners' association.* * *(c) Solar energy systems.--Notwithstanding subsection (a), the association may not prohibit or restrict the installation or use of a solar energy system on a detached roof . The association may provide reasonable regulation of solar energy systems for the following purposes:(1) To require that a solar energy system meets applicable health and safety standards and requirements imposed by State and local permitting authorities.(2) To require that, if used to heat water, a solar energy system is certified by the Solar Rating and Certification Corporation or other nationally recognized certification agency. Certification must be for the solar energy system itself and for the method of installation.(3) To require that, if used to produce electricity, a 20250HB1239PN2022 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 solar energy system meets all applicable safety and performance standards established by the National Electrical Code, the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers, accredited testing laboratories, such as Underwriters Laboratories, and applicable rules of agencies of the Commonwealth regarding safety and reliability.(4) To require that a solar energy system frame, a support bracket or any visible piping or wiring be painted to coordinate with the roofing material.(5) To require unit owners installing solar energy systems to indemnify or reimburse the association or its member for loss or damage caused by the installation, maintenance or use of the solar energy system.(6) To include other reasonable rules regarding the placement of solar energy systems so as to maintain the aesthetic qualities of the buildings and grounds of the community.(7) THIS SUBSECTION SHALL NOT APPLY TO A FREESTANDING SOLAR ENERGY SYSTEM PLACED ON A PARCEL OF LAND WITHIN A PROPERTY DEEDED OTHER THAN TO THE ASSOCIATION.Section 3. Section 5103 of Title 68 is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 5103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subpart and in the declaration and bylaws shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless specifically provided otherwise or unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Detached roof." A roof of a unit that is solely owned by an individual and is not designated as part of the common elements 20250HB1239PN2022 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OR CONTROLLED FACILITIES in the governing documents of the association.* * *"Solar energy system." Any of the following that have the primary purpose of providing for the collection, storage and distribution of solar or radiant energy received from the sun:(1) A solar collection panel, film, shingle or other solar energy device.(2) A solar structural component fixed in an operating position.* * *Section 4. Section 5302 of Title 68 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 5302. Power of unit owners' association.* * *(c) Solar energy systems.--Notwithstanding subsection (a), the association may not prohibit or restrict the installation or use of a solar energy system on a detached roof. The association may provide reasonable regulation of solar energy systems for the following purposes:(1) To require that a solar energy system meets applicable health and safety standards and requirements imposed by State and local permitting authorities.(2) To require that, if used to heat water, a solar energy system is certified by the Solar Rating and Certification Corporation or other nationally recognized certification agency. Certification must be for the solar energy system itself and for the method of installation.(3) To require that, if used to produce electricity, a solar energy system meets all applicable safety and 20250HB1239PN2022 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 performance standards established by the National Electrical Code, the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers, accredited testing laboratories, such as Underwriters Laboratories, and applicable rules of agencies of the Commonwealth regarding safety and reliability.(4) To require that a solar energy system frame, a support bracket or any visible piping or wiring be painted to coordinate with the roofing material.(5) To require unit owners installing solar energy systems to indemnify or reimburse the association or its member for loss or damage caused by the installation, maintenance or use of the solar energy system.(6) To include other reasonable rules regarding the placement of solar energy systems so as to maintain the aesthetic qualities of the buildings and grounds of the community.(7) THIS SUBSECTION SHALL NOT APPLY TO A FREESTANDING SOLAR ENERGY SYSTEM PLACED ON A PARCEL OF LAND WITHIN A PROPERTY DEEDED OTHER THAN TO THE ASSOCIATION.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1239PN2022 - 5 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920